New York, session 2025-2026, S3824.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The opening paragraph of subdivision 1 of section 640 of 2 the education law, as added by chapter 180 of the laws of 2022, is 3 amended to read as follows: 4 No degree-granting institution, elementary school, secondary school, 5 or licensed private career school, as defined by section five thousand 6 one of this chapter, shall: 7 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD08315-03-5